District of Columbia statutes.
29A-201.33

Repealed

Meeting of stockholders for purpose of increase or diminution of capital stock, or change of business — Certificate by chairman.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1288, ch. 854, § 637
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-201.33.
1981 Ed., § 29-233.
1973 Ed., § 29-233.